Mississippi, session 2026, SB2325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Governor, by appropriate executive order, is authorized to restore the right of suffrage to any person disqualified by reason of conviction for vote fraud or any crime listed in Section 241, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, when all of the following conditions are met: (a)  The person has completed the sentence imposed by the court of original jurisdiction upon conviction of the disenfranchising crime, including the service of any term of incarceration, parole, probation and post-release supervision; and (b)  The person has paid all fees and fines imposed by the court of original jurisdiction upon conviction of the disenfranchising crime. (2)  A person enfranchised under subsection (1) of this section has the full right of suffrage as though an act had been passed by the Legislature in accordance with Section 253, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, restoring the right of suffrage to the person. SECTION 2. (1)  An executive order restoring the right of suffrage shall be sufficient evidence to prove that a person is not disqualified to register to vote based on a conviction of a disenfranchising crime.  A person who presents an executive order or duly enacted suffrage bill restoring the right of suffrage or who swears and affirms that the person's right of suffrage has been restored as provided in Section 1 of this act shall not be denied the right to register to vote or to cast a ballot based upon a conviction of a disenfranchising crime. (2)  At a minimum, the executive order restoring the right of suffrage shall provide as follows: (a)  The person to whom the executive order is issued has satisfied the conditions imposed in Section 1(1) of this act; and (b)  The court records and the records of the Mississippi Department of Corrections indicate that the person has not been convicted of another disenfranchising offense other than the one (1) subject to the executive order. (3)  Upon issuance of an executive order restoring the right of suffrage to a person, the Governor or other designated state official shall forward a certified copy of the executive order to the registrar in the county in which the person resides or desires to be a qualified elector. SECTION 3. (1)  When a person is discharged or released as provided in Section 47-5-157, the Mississippi Department of Corrections shall automatically provide to the Governor a written report on any person who meets the conditions set forth in Section 1(1) of this act.  When a person is discharged from probation as provided in Section 47-7-41, the court of original jurisdiction shall automatically provide to the Governor a written report on any person who meets the conditions set forth in Section 1(1) of this act.  The written report shall include the information required for the executive order as set forth in Section 2 of this act. (2)  A person who satisfied the conditions set forth in Section 1(1) of this act on or before July 1, 2020, may submit a written request to the department or the court of original jurisdiction for the case in which the person was convicted of a disenfranchising crime.  The department or the court shall each have the duty and responsibility to determine if it is the appropriate authority to issue the written report on the person, to review the person's record, and to respond to the request.  The department or court shall respond to the person's request within forty-five (45) days of receipt.  If the person meets the conditions set forth in Section 1(1) of this act, the person's written report shall be provided to the Governor within forty-five (45) days of receiving the initial request. SECTION 4.  Section 23-15-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-11.  Every inhabitant of this state, except persons adjudicated to be non compos mentis, who is a citizen of the United States of America, eighteen (18) years old and upwards, who has resided in this state for thirty (30) days and for thirty (30) days in the county in which he or she seeks to vote, and for thirty (30) days in the incorporated municipality in which he or she seeks to vote, and who has been duly registered as an elector under Section 23-15-33, and who * * * has never been, if convicted of vote fraud or of any crime listed in Section 241, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, has been restored the right of suffrage by executive order as provided in Section 1 of this act or by act of the Legislature under Section 253, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, shall be a qualified elector in and for the county, municipality and voting precinct of his or her residence, and shall be entitled to vote at any election upon compliance with Section 23-15-563.  If the thirtieth day to register before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the registration applications submitted on the business day immediately following the Sunday or legal holiday shall be accepted and entered in the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of enabling voters to vote in the next election.  Any person who will be eighteen (18) years of age or older on or before the date of the general election and who is duly registered to vote not less than thirty (30) days before the primary election associated with the general election, may vote in the primary election even though the person has not reached his or her eighteenth birthday at the time that the person seeks to vote at the primary election.  No others than those specified in this section shall be entitled, or shall be allowed, to vote at any election. SECTION 5.  Section 23-15-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-19.  (1)  Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who has been convicted of vote fraud or any crime listed in Section 241, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, such crimes defined as "disenfranchising," shall not be registered, or if registered the name of the person shall be removed from the Statewide Elections Management System by the registrar or the election commissioners of the county of his or her residence.  Whenever any person shall be convicted in the circuit court of his or her county of a disenfranchising crime, the county registrar shall thereupon remove his or her name from the Statewide Elections Management System; and whenever any person shall be convicted of a disenfranchising crime in any other court of any county, the presiding judge of the court shall, on demand, certify the fact in writing to the registrar of the county in which the voter resides, who shall thereupon remove the name of the person from the Statewide Elections Management System and retain the certificate as a record of his or her office. (2)  A person who presents to the registrar a suffrage bill or an executive order restoring the right of suffrage shall not be denied the right to register to vote based on that conviction of a disenfranchising crime.  A person who swears and affirms that the person has been restored the right of suffrage shall not be denied the right to register to vote based on that conviction of a disenfranchising crime. SECTION 6.  Section 23-15-151, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-151.  (1)  The circuit clerk of each county is authorized and directed to prepare and keep in his or her office a full and complete list, in alphabetical order, of persons convicted of * * * voter vote fraud or of any crime listed in Section 241, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, who has not been restored the right of suffrage. A certified copy of any enrollment by one clerk to another will be sufficient authority for the enrollment of the name, or names, in another county.  A list of persons convicted of * * * voter vote fraud, any crime listed in Section 241, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, or any crime interpreted as disenfranchising in later Attorney General opinions and not restored the right of suffrage, shall also be entered into the Statewide Elections Management System on a quarterly basis.  Except as provided in Section 1 of this act, Section 23-15-19 and Section 253 of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890, voters who have been convicted in a Mississippi state court of any disenfranchising crime are not qualified electors as defined by Section 23-15-11 and shall be purged or otherwise removed by the county registrar or county election commissioners from the Statewide Elections Management System. (2)  The circuit clerk of each county is authorized and directed to keep in the clerk's office, in alphabetical order, the certified copies of suffrage bills and of executive orders restoring the right of suffrage provided to the clerk as set forth in Section 2 of this act.  A certified copy of any executive order by one clerk to another will be sufficient authority for purposes of Section 23-15-19(2) in another county. SECTION 7.  Section 23-15-125, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-125.  The pollbook of each voting precinct shall designate the voting precinct for which it is to be used, and shall be ruled in appropriate columns, with printed or written headings, as follows:  date of registration; voter registration number; name of electors; date of birth; and a number of blank columns for the dates of elections.  All qualified applicants who register with the registrar shall be entered in the Statewide Elections Management System.  Only the names of those qualified applicants who register within thirty (30) days before an election shall appear on the pollbooks of the election; however, if the thirtieth day to register before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the registration applications submitted on the business day immediately following the legal holiday shall be accepted and entered in the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of enabling voters to vote in the next election.  When county election commissioners determine that any elector is disqualified from voting, by reason of death, conviction of a disenfranchising crime if the right of suffrage has not been restored, removal from the jurisdiction, failure to comply with the provisions of Section 23-15-152, or other legal cause, that fact shall be noted in the Statewide Elections Management System and the voter's name shall be purged from the Statewide Elections Management System, the state's voter roll and the county's pollbooks.  Nothing in this section shall preclude the use of electronic pollbooks. SECTION 8.  Section 23-15-153, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-153.  (1)  At least during the following times, the election commissioners shall meet at the office of the registrar or the office of the election commissioners to carefully revise the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System and remove from the roll the names of all voters who have requested to be purged from the voter roll, died, received an adjudication of non compos mentis, been convicted of a disenfranchising crime if the right of suffrage has not been restored, failed to comply with the provisions of Section 23-15-152, or otherwise become disqualified as electors for any cause, and shall register the names of all persons who have duly applied to be registered but have been illegally denied registration: (a)  On the Tuesday after the second Monday in January 1987 and every following year; (b)  On the first Tuesday in the month immediately preceding the first primary election for members of Congress in the years when members of Congress are elected; (c)  On the first Monday in the month immediately preceding the first primary election for state, state district legislative, county and county district offices in the years in which those offices are elected; and (d)  On the second Monday of September preceding the general election or regular special election day in years in which a general election is not conducted. Except for the names of those voters who are duly qualified to vote in the election, no name shall be permitted to remain in the Statewide Elections Management System; however, no name shall be purged from the Statewide Elections Management System based on a change in the residence of an elector except in accordance with procedures provided for by the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 and as provided in Section 23-15-152.  Except as otherwise provided by Section 23-15-573, no person shall vote at any election whose name is not in the county voter roll electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System. (2)  Except as provided in this section, and subject to the following annual limitations, the election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Ten Dollars ($110.00), to be paid from the county general fund, for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties in the conduct of an election or actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in the revision of the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System as required in subsection (1) of this section: (a)  In counties having less than fifteen thousand (15,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than fifty (50) days per year, with no more than fifteen (15) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (b)  In counties having fifteen thousand (15,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than thirty thousand (30,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than seventy-five (75) days per year, with no more than twenty-five (25) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (c)  In counties having thirty thousand (30,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than seventy thousand (70,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred (100) days per year, with no more than thirty-five (35) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (l) occurring in any calendar year; (d)  In counties having seventy thousand (70,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than ninety thousand (90,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred twenty-five (125) days per year, with no more than forty-five (45) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (e)  In counties having ninety thousand (90,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than one hundred seventy thousand (170,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred fifty (150) days per year, with no more than fifty-five (55) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (f)  In counties having one hundred seventy thousand (170,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred thousand (200,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred seventy-five (175) days per year, with no more than sixty-five (65) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (g)  In counties having two hundred thousand (200,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred twenty-five thousand (225,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred ninety (190) days per year, with no more than seventy-five (75) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (l) occurring in any calendar year; (h)  In counties having two hundred twenty-five thousand (225,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than two hundred fifteen (215) days per year, with no more than eighty-five (85) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (i)  In counties having two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred seventy-five thousand (275,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than two hundred thirty (230) days per year, with no more than ninety-five (95) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (j)  In counties having two hundred seventy-five thousand (275,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census or more, not more than two hundred forty (240) days per year, with no more than one hundred five (105) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (l) occurring in any calendar year. (3)  In addition to the number of days authorized in subsection (2) of this section, the board of supervisors of a county may authorize, in its discretion, the election commissioners to receive a per diem in the amount provided for in subsection (2) of this section, to be paid from the county general fund, for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties in the conduct of an election or actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in the revision of the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System as required in subsection (1) of this section, not to exceed five (5) days. (4)  (a)  The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Ten Dollars ($110.00), to be paid from the county general fund, not to exceed ten (10) days for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in the revision of the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System before any special election.  For purposes of this paragraph, the regular special election day shall not be considered a special election.  The annual limitations set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to this paragraph. (b)  The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Sixty-five Dollars ($165.00), to be paid from the county general fund, for the performance of their duties on the day of any primary, runoff, general or special election; however, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, pay the election commissioners an additional amount not to exceed Thirty-five Dollars ($35.00) per election.  The annual limitations set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall apply to this paragraph. (5)  The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Ten Dollars ($110.00), to be paid from the county general fund, not to exceed fourteen (14) days for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in the revision of the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System and in the conduct of a runoff election following either a general or special election. (6)  The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive only one (1) per diem payment for those days when the election commissioners discharge more than one (1) duty or responsibility on the same day. (7)  The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Ten Dollars ($110.00), to be paid from the county general fund, not to exceed five (5) days for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days for those days when the election commissioners shall be required to conduct an audit of an election as provided in Section 23-15-615. (8)  In preparation for a municipal primary, runoff, general or special election, the county registrar shall generate and distribute the master voter roll and pollbooks from the Statewide Elections Management System for the municipality located within the county.  The municipality shall pay the county registrar for the actual cost of preparing and printing the municipal master voter roll pollbooks.  A municipality may secure "read only" access to the Statewide Elections Management System and print its own pollbooks using this information. (9)  County election commissioners who perform the duties of an executive committee with regard to the conduct of a primary election under a written agreement authorized by law to be entered into with an executive committee shall receive per diem as provided for in subsection (2) of this section.  The days that county election commissioners are employed in the conduct of a primary election shall be treated the same as days county election commissioners are employed in the conduct of other elections. (10)  In addition to any per diem authorized by this section, any election commissioner shall be entitled to the mileage reimbursement rate allowable to federal employees for the use of a privately owned vehicle while on official travel on election day. (11)  Every election commissioner shall sign personally a certification setting forth the number of hours actually worked in the performance of the commissioner's official duties and for which the commissioner seeks compensation.  The certification must be on a form as prescribed in this subsection.  The commissioner's signature is, as a matter of law, made under the commissioner's oath of office and under penalties of perjury. The certification form shall be as follows: COUNTY ELECTION COMMISSIONER PER DIEM CLAIM FORM NAME: ____________________________    COUNTY:  _______________ ADDRESS: _________________________    DISTRICT:  _____________ CITY: ______________  ZIP: ________ PURPOSE  APPLICABLE    ACTUAL  PER DIEM DATE    BEGINNING  ENDING OF      MS CODE     HOURS     DAYS WORKED     TIME      TIME    WORK SECTION     WORKED   EARNED ________________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________ TOTAL NUMBER OF PER DIEM DAYS EARNED EXCLUDING ELECTION DAYS                        ________ PER DIEM RATE PER DAY EARNED X $110.00 TOTAL NUMBER PER DIEM DAYS EARNED FOR ELECTION DAYS                              ________ PER DIEM RATE PER DAY EARNED X $165.00 BOARD OF SUPERVISORS ELECTION DAY DISCRETIONARY ADDITION(S) TO PER DIEM RATE PER DAY EARNED      X  $35.00 TOTAL AMOUNT OF PER DIEM CLAIMED $_______ I understand that I am signing this document under my oath as  an election commissioner and under penalties of perjury. I understand that I am requesting payment from taxpayer funds and that I have an obligation to be specific and truthful as to the amount of hours worked and the compensation I am requesting. Signed this the _____ day of ______________, ____. ________________________ Commissioner's Signature When properly completed and signed, the certification must be filed with the clerk of the county board of supervisors before any payment may be made.  The certification will be a public record available for inspection and reproduction immediately upon the oral or written request of any person. Any person may contest the accuracy of the certification in any respect by notifying the chair of the commission, any member of the board of supervisors or the clerk of the board of supervisors of the contest at any time before or after payment is made.  If the contest is made before payment is made, no payment shall be made as to the contested certificate until the contest is finally disposed of.  The person filing the contest shall be entitled to a full hearing, and the clerk of the board of supervisors shall issue subpoenas upon request of the contestor compelling the attendance of witnesses and production of documents and things. The contestor shall have the right to appeal de novo to the circuit court of the involved county, which appeal must be perfected within thirty (30) days from a final decision of the commission, the clerk of the board of supervisors or the board of supervisors, as the case may be. Any contestor who successfully contests any certification will be awarded all expenses incident to his or her contest, together with reasonable attorney's fees, which will be awarded upon petition to the chancery court of the involved county upon final disposition of the contest before the election commission, board of supervisors, clerk of the board of supervisors, or, in case of an appeal, final disposition by the court.  The commissioner against whom the contest is decided shall be liable for the payment of the expenses and attorney's fees, and the county shall be jointly and severally liable for same. (12)  Any election commissioner who has not received a certificate issued by the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 23-15-211 indicating that the election commissioner has received the required elections seminar instruction and that the election commissioner is fully qualified to conduct an election, shall not receive any compensation authorized by this section or Section 23-15-239. SECTION 9.  Section 23-15-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-39.  (1)  Applications for registration as electors of this state, which are sworn to and subscribed before the registrar or deputy registrar authorized by law and which are not made by mail, shall be made upon a form established by rule duly adopted by the Secretary of State.  The application shall state that a person who has been restored the right of suffrage by executive order as provided in Section 1 of this act, by gubernatorial pardon, or by legislative act, is not disqualified to register to vote under Section 23-15-11. (2)  The boards of supervisors shall make proper allowances for office supplies reasonably necessitated by the registration of county electors. (3)  If the applicant indicates on the application that he or she resides within the city limits of a city or town in the county of registration, the county registrar shall process the application for registration or changes to the registration as provided by law. (4)  If the applicant indicates on the application that he or she has previously registered to vote in another county of this state or another state, notice to the voter's previous county of registration in this state shall be provided by the Statewide Elections Management System.  If the voter's previous place of registration was in another state, notice shall be provided to the voter's previous state of residence if the Statewide Elections Management System has that capability. (5)  The county registrar shall provide to the person making the application a copy of the application upon which has been written the county voting precinct and municipal voting precinct, if any, in which the person shall vote.  Upon entry of the voter registration information into the Statewide Elections Management System, the system shall assign a voter registration number to the person, and the county registrar shall mail the applicant a voter registration card to the mailing address provided on the application. (6)  Any person desiring an application for registration may secure an application from the registrar of the county of which he or she is a resident and may take the application with him or her and secure assistance in completing the application from any person of the applicant's choice.  It shall be the duty of all registrars to furnish applications for registration to all persons requesting them, and it shall likewise be the registrar's duty to furnish aid and assistance in the completing of the application when requested by an applicant.  The application for registration shall be sworn to and subscribed before the registrar or deputy registrar at the municipal clerk's office, the county registrar's office or any other location where the applicant is allowed to register to vote.  The registrar shall not charge a fee or cost to the applicant for accepting the application or administering the oath or for any other duty imposed by law regarding the registration of electors. (7)  If the person making the application is unable to read or write, for reason of disability or otherwise, he or she shall not be required to personally complete the application in writing and execute the oath.  In such cases, the registrar or deputy registrar shall read the application and oath to the person, and the person's answers thereto shall be recorded by the registrar or the registrar's deputy.  The person shall be registered as an elector if he or she otherwise meets the requirements to be registered as an elector.  The registrar shall record the responses of the person and the recorded responses shall be retained permanently by the registrar.  The county registrar shall enter the voter registration information into the Statewide Elections Management System and designate the entry as an assisted filing. (8)  The receipt of a copy of the application for registration sent pursuant to Section 23-15-35(2) shall be sufficient to allow the applicant to be registered as an elector of this state, if the application is not challenged. (9)  In any case in which the corporate boundaries of a municipality change, whether by annexation or redistricting, the municipal clerk shall, within ten (10) days after approval of the change in corporate boundaries, provide to the county registrar conforming geographic data that is compatible with the Statewide Elections Management System.  The data shall be developed by the municipality's use of a standardized format specified by the Statewide Elections Management System.  The county registrar, county election commissioner or other county official, who has completed an annual training seminar sponsored by the Secretary of State pertaining to the implementation of new boundary lines in the Statewide Elections Management System and received certification for that training, shall update the municipal boundary information into the Statewide Elections Management System.  The Statewide Elections Management System updates the municipal voter registration records and assigns electors to their municipal voting precincts. The county registrar shall forward to the municipal clerk written notification of the additions and changes, and the municipal clerk shall forward to the affected municipal electors written notification of the additions and changes. SECTION 10.  Section 23-15-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-47.  (1)  Any person who is qualified to register to vote in the State of Mississippi may register to vote by mail-in application in the manner prescribed in this section. (2)  The following procedure shall be used in the registration of electors by mail: (a)  Any qualified elector may register to vote by mailing or delivering a completed mail-in application to his or her county registrar at least thirty (30) days before any election; however, if the thirtieth day to register before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the registration applications submitted on the business day immediately following the Sunday or legal holiday shall be accepted and entered into the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of enabling voters to vote in the next election.  The postmark date of a mailed application shall be the applicant's date of registration. (b)  Upon receipt of a mail-in application, the county registrar shall stamp the application with the date of receipt, and shall verify the application either by matching the applicant's Mississippi driver's license number through the Mississippi Department of Public Safety or by matching the applicant's social security number through the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators. Within fourteen (14) days of receipt of a mail-in registration application, the county registrar shall complete action on the application, including any attempts to notify the applicant of the status of his or her application. (c)  If the county registrar determines that the applicant is qualified and his or her application is legible and complete, the county registrar shall mail the applicant written notification that the application has been approved, specifying the county voting precinct, municipal voting precinct, if any, polling place and supervisor district in which the person shall vote.  This written notification of approval containing the specified information shall be the voter's registration card.  The registration card shall be provided by the county registrar to the applicant in accordance with Section 23-15-39.  Upon entry of the voter registration information into the Statewide Elections Management System, the system shall assign a voter registration number to the applicant. The assigned voter registration number shall be clearly shown on the written notification of approval.  In mailing the written notification, the county registrar shall note the following on the envelope:  "DO NOT FORWARD".  If any registration notification form is returned as undeliverable, the voter's registration shall be void. (d)  A mail-in application shall be rejected for any of the following reasons: (i)  An incomplete portion of the application makes it impossible for the registrar to determine the eligibility of the applicant to register; (ii)  A portion of the application is illegible in the opinion of the county registrar and makes it impossible to determine the eligibility of the applicant to register; (iii)  The county registrar is unable to determine, from the address and information stated on the application, the precinct in which the voter should be assigned or the supervisor district in which he or she is entitled to vote; (iv)  The applicant is not qualified to register to vote pursuant to Section 23-15-11; (v)  The county registrar determines that the applicant is already registered as a qualified elector of the county; (vi)  The county registrar is unable to verify the application pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section. (e)  If the mail-in application of a person is subject to rejection for any of the reasons set forth in paragraph (d)(i) through (iii) of this subsection, and it appears to the county registrar that the defect or omission is of such a minor nature and that any necessary additional information may be supplied by the applicant over the telephone or by further correspondence, the county registrar may write or call the applicant at the telephone number or address, or both, provided on the application.  If the county registrar is able to contact the applicant by mail or telephone, the county registrar shall attempt to ascertain the necessary information, and if this information is sufficient for the registrar to complete the application, the applicant shall be registered.  If the necessary information cannot be obtained by mail or telephone, or is not sufficient to complete the application within fourteen (14) days of receipt, the county registrar shall give the applicant written notice of the rejection and provide the reason for the rejection.  The county registrar shall further inform the applicant that he or she has a right to attempt to register by appearing in person or by filing another mail-in application. (f)  If a mail-in application is subject to rejection for the reason stated in paragraph (d)(v) of this subsection and the "present home address" portion of the application is different from the residence address for the applicant found in the Statewide Elections Management System, the mail-in application shall be deemed a written request to update the voter's registration pursuant to Section 23-15-13.  The county registrar or the election commissioners shall update the voter's residence address in the Statewide Elections Management System and, if necessary, advise the voter of a change in the location of his or her county or municipal polling place by mailing the voter a new voter registration card. (3)  The instructions and the application form for voter registration by mail shall be in a form established by rule duly adopted by the Secretary of State.  The instructions and the application must state that a person who has been restored the right of suffrage by executive order as provided in Section 1 of this act, by gubernatorial pardon, or by legislative act, is not disqualified to register to vote pursuant to Section 23-15-11. (4)  (a)  The Secretary of State shall prepare and furnish without charge the necessary forms for application for voter registration by mail to each county registrar, municipal clerk, all public schools, each private school that requests such applications * * *, and all public libraries. (b)  The Secretary of State shall distribute without charge sufficient forms for application for voter registration by mail to the Commissioner of Public Safety, who shall distribute the forms to each driver's license examining and renewal station in the state, and shall ensure that the forms are regularly available to the public at such stations. (c)  Bulk quantities of forms for application for voter registration by mail shall be furnished by the Secretary of State to any person or organization.  The Secretary of State shall charge a person or organization the actual cost he or she incurs in providing bulk quantities of forms for application for voter registration to such person or organization. (5)  The originals of completed mail-in applications shall remain on file in the office of the county registrar with copies retained in the Statewide Elections Management System. (6)  If the applicant indicates on the application that he or she resides within the city limits of a city or town in the county of registration, the county registrar shall enter the information into the Statewide Elections Management System. (7)  If the applicant indicates on the application that he or she has previously registered to vote in another county of this state or another state, notice to the voter's previous county of registration in this state shall be provided through the Statewide Elections Management System.  If the voter's previous place of registration was in another state, notice shall be provided to the voter's previous state of residence. (8)  Any person who attempts to register to vote by mail shall be subject to the penalties for false registration provided for in Section 23-15-17. SECTION 11.  Section 23-15-165, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-165.  (1)  The Office of the Secretary of State, in cooperation with the county registrars and election commissioners, shall procure, implement and maintain an electronic information processing system and programs capable of maintaining a centralized database of all registered voters in the state.  The system shall encompass software and hardware, at both the state and county level, software development training, conversion and support and maintenance for the system. The Secretary of State shall equip the Statewide Elections Management System with appropriate security measures to protect private information of the registered voter and the integrity of Mississippi elections.  This system shall be known as the "Statewide Elections Management System" and shall constitute the official record of registered voters in every county of the state. (2)  The Office of the Secretary of State shall develop and implement the Statewide Elections Management System so that the registrar and election commissioners of each county shall: (a)  Verify that an applicant that is registering to vote in that county is not registered to vote in another county; (b)  Be notified automatically that a registered voter in its county has registered to vote in another county; (c)  Receive regular reports of death, changes of address and convictions for disenfranchising crimes that apply to voters registered in the county; (d)  Receive regular reports of executive orders restoring the right of suffrage issued as provided in Section 2 of this act; ( * * *de)  Retain all present functionality related to, but not limited to, the use of voter roll data and to implement such other functionality as the law requires to enhance the maintenance of accurate county voter records and related jury selection and redistricting programs; and ( * * *ef)  When evidence exists that a registered voter may not be a citizen of the United States as provided in Section 23-15-15, send notification to the registrar of the location where the person is registered to vote. (3)  As a part of the procurement and implementation of the system, the Office of the Secretary of State shall, with the assistance of the advisory committee, procure services necessary to convert current voter registration records in the counties into a standard, industry accepted file format that can be used on the Statewide Elections Management System.  Thereafter, all official voter information shall be maintained on the Statewide Elections Management System.  The standard industry accepted format of data  was reviewed and approved by a majority of the advisory committee created in subsection (5) of this section after consultation with the Circuit Clerks Association, and the format may not be changed without consulting the Circuit Clerks Association. (4)  The Secretary of State may, with the assistance of the advisory committee, adopt rules and regulations necessary to administer the Statewide Elections Management System.  The rules and regulations shall at least: (a)  Provide for the establishment and maintenance of a centralized database for all voter registration information in the state; (b)  Provide procedures for integrating data into the centralized database; (c)  Provide security to ensure that only the registrar, or his or her designee or other appropriate official, as the law may require, can add information to, delete information from and modify information in the system; (d)  Provide the registrar or his or her designee or other appropriate official, as the law may require, access to the system at all times, including the ability to download copies of the industry standard file, for all purposes related to their official duties, including, but not limited to, exclusive access for the purpose of printing all local pollbooks; (e)  Provide security and protection of all information in the system and monitor the system to ensure that unauthorized access is not allowed; (f)  Provide a procedure that will allow the registrar, or his or her designee or other appropriate official, as the law may require, to identify the precinct to which a voter should be assigned; and (g)  Provide a procedure for phasing in or converting existing manual and computerized voter registration systems in counties to the Statewide Elections Management System. (5)  The Secretary of State established an advisory committee to assist in developing system specifications, procurement, implementation and maintenance of the Statewide Elections Management System.  The committee included two (2) representatives from the Circuit Clerks Association, appointed by the association; two (2) representatives from the Election Commissioners Association of Mississippi, appointed by the association; one (1) member of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors, or its staff, appointed by the association; the Director of the Stennis Institute of Government at Mississippi State University, or his or her designee; the Executive Director of the Department of Information Technology Services, or his or her designee; two (2) persons knowledgeable about elections and information technology appointed by the Secretary of State; and the Secretary of State, who shall serve as the chair of the advisory committee. (6)  (a)  Social security numbers, telephone numbers, email addresses, and date of birth and age information in statewide, district, county and municipal voter registration files shall be exempt from and shall not be subject to inspection, examination, copying or reproduction under the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983. (b)  Copies of statewide, district, county or municipal voter registration files, excluding social security numbers, telephone numbers, email addresses, and date of birth and age information, shall be provided to any person in accordance with the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983 at a cost not to exceed the actual cost of production. SECTION 12.  Section 47-7-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-7-31.  (1)  Upon request of the Governor, the Department of Corrections shall investigate and report to him with respect to any case of pardon, commutation of sentence, reprieve, furlough or remission of fine or forfeiture. (2)  At least once each quarter, the department shall investigate and report in writing to the Governor the names of those persons either in the department's custody or discharged from the department's custody who should be considered for a pardon, commutation of sentence, reprieve, furlough or remission of fine or forfeiture. (3)  Any attorney of record in the State of Mississippi representing any person whose record is before the department shall have the right to inspect such records on file with the department. SECTION 13.  Section 47-7-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-7-41.  When a probationer shall be discharged from probation by the court of original jurisdiction, the field supervisor * * *, upon receiving a written request from the probationer, shall automatically forward a written report of the record of the probationer to the Division of Community Corrections of the department, which shall present a copy of this report to the Governor.  The Governor may, in his discretion, at any time thereafter by appropriate executive order restore any civil rights, including any right of suffrage, lost by the probationer by virtue of his conviction or plea of guilty in the court of original jurisdiction. SECTION 14.  Section 47-5-157, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-5-157.  (1)  (a) When an offender is entitled to a discharge from the custody of the department, or is released therefrom on parole, pardon, or otherwise, the commissioner or his designee shall prepare and deliver to him a written discharge or release, as the case may be, dated and signed by him with seal annexed, giving the offender's name, the name of the offense or offenses for which he was convicted, the term of sentence imposed and the date thereof, the county in which he was sentenced, the amount of commutation received, if any, the trade he has learned, if any, his proficiency in same, and such description of the offender as may be practicable and the discharge plan developed as required by law.  At least fifteen (15) days prior to the release of an offender as described herein, the director of records of the department shall give the written notice which is required pursuant to Section 47-5-177. (b)  Additionally, the department shall automatically forward a copy of the written discharge or release to the Governor.  The Governor may, in his discretion, at any time thereafter by appropriate executive order, restore any civil rights, including any right of suffrage, lost by the person by virtue of his or her conviction or plea of guilty in the court of original jurisdiction. (2)  The offender shall be furnished: (a)  A Mississippi driver's license, if eligible; (b)  A provisional license under Section 63-1-305; or (c)  A state identification card that is not a department-issued identification card. The offender shall also be furnished all money held to his credit by any official of the correctional system and, if needed, suitable civilian clothes. (3)  The amount of money which an offender is entitled to receive from the State of Mississippi when he is discharged from the state correctional system shall be determined as follows: (a)  If he has continuously served his sentence in one (1) year or less flat time, he shall be given Fifteen Dollars ($15.00). (b)  If he has served his sentence in more than one (1) year flat time and in less than ten (10) years flat time, he shall be given Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). (c)  If he has continuously served his sentence in ten (10) or more years flat time, he shall be given Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00). (d)  If he has continuously served his sentence in twenty (20) or more years flat time, he shall be given One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). (e)  There shall be given in addition to the above specified monies in paragraphs (a), (b), (c) and (d) of this subsection, a bus ticket to the county of conviction or to a state line of Mississippi. SECTION 15. Upon petition therefor, a justice, county, circuit or municipal court shall expunge the record of any such conviction from all public records in any case in which a full pardon was made by the Governor. SECTION 16.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.